Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.190

Compensation paid by agency, self-insurer, social security administration, or veterans' administration on behalf of child.

(1) When the department of labor and industries or a self-insurer pays compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW on behalf of or on account of the child or children of the injured worker for whom the injured worker owes a duty of child support, the amount of compensation the department or self-insurer pays on behalf of the child or children shall be treated for all purposes as if the injured worker paid the compensation toward satisfaction of the injured worker's child support obligations.

(2) When the social security administration pays social security disability dependency benefits, retirement benefits, or survivors insurance benefits on behalf of or on account of the child or children of a person with disabilities, a retired person, or a deceased person, the amount of benefits paid for the child or children shall be treated for all purposes as if the person with disabilities, the retired person, or the deceased person paid the benefits toward the satisfaction of that person's child support obligation for that period for which benefits are paid.

(3) When the veterans' administration apportions a veteran's benefits to pay child support on behalf of or on account of the child or children of the veteran, the amount paid for the child or children shall be treated for all purposes as if the veteran paid the benefits toward the satisfaction of that person's child support obligation for that period for which benefits are paid.

(4) Under no circumstances shall the person who has the obligation to make the transfer payment have a right to reimbursement of any compensation paid under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section.

[ 2015 c 124 s 1; 1995 c 236 s 1; 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 26.09.100.